test/src/morphology/N-maniway_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Verb - maniway - ok : # -m animate noun
     maniway+N+AN+Sg+Px1Sg: naniway
     maniway+N+AN+Sg+Px2Sg: kaniway
     maniway+N+AN+Sg+Px3Sg: otaniway
     maniway+N+AN+Sg+Px3iSg: maniway
     maniway+N+AN+Sg+Px1Pl: naniwaynân
     maniway+N+AN+Sg+Px12Pl: kiniwaynân # kinawaynân ???
     maniway+N+AN+Sg+Px2Pl: kaniwaywâw
     maniway+N+AN+Sg+Px3Pl: naniwaywâw
